Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

General Provisions

6-52-101. Tax levy to pay indebtedness of former municipality.

The county legislative bodies are empowered to levy a special tax within the territory embraced within the limits of any incorporated town or city whose charter has been abolished and no new charter granted, or no reincorporation has taken place, or when a new charter has been granted making no provision for the indebtedness of the former corporation, for the purposes of meeting existing indebtedness due, meeting annual or semiannual interest charges on bonded indebtedness, providing any required sinking fund, and paying off all indebtedness when due.

Acts 1903, ch. 356, § 1; Shan., § 1997a8; mod. Code 1932, § 3512; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-401.

Cross-References. Liquidation of affairs of city manager-commission city, §§ 6-18-112, 6-18-113.

6-52-102. Collection and disposition of tax.

The proceeds of the special tax levied by § 6-52-101 shall be collected by the county trustee and paid out upon warrant of the county mayor for the purposes enumerated in § 6-52-101, and not otherwise.

Acts 1903, ch. 356, § 2; Shan., § 1997a9; Code 1932, § 3513; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-403; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

6-52-103. Right to condemnation proceeds after dissolution.

Where any governmental agency, corporation, association, firm, partnership or individual is authorized under the laws of this state, or of the United States, to take property belonging to any of the incorporated municipalities, cities or towns within this state, and such power and authority is exercised to the extent that such incorporated municipality, city or town can no longer function as such, the right to compensation for the property so taken shall vest in the taxpayers of such incorporated municipality, city or town owning real estate or personal property assessed for ad valorem taxes within such incorporated municipality, city or town.

Such rights shall become vested as of the date the first property or properties are acquired by such governmental agency, corporation, association, firm, partnership or individual having the right under the laws of this state or the United States to acquire such property, either by sale, condemnation proceedings or eminent domain.

Acts 1947, ch. 55, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3511.1 (Williams, § 3170.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-403.

6-52-104. Apportionment and distribution of condemnation proceeds.

Where any incorporated municipality, city or town is compelled to surrender its charter by reason of the taking of its property by any governmental agency, corporation, association, firm, partnership or individual vested with the authority to purchase or condemn or take the properties of such incorporated municipality, city or town under the power of eminent domain, the proceeds derived from the taking of such municipal properties shall belong to, and become vested in, such taxpayers in proportion to the amount of such taxes paid or owing by such taxpayers to such incorporated municipality for the year that the first property or properties are acquired by such governmental agency, corporation, association, firm, partnership or individual; provided, that where no taxes have been assessed for such year, then the next preceding tax year shall constitute the basis for distribution. Such distribution shall be made only after payment of all indebtedness owing by such municipality, city or town incorporated under the laws of this state.

Acts 1947, ch. 55, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3511.2 (Williams, § 3170.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-404.

6-52-105. New corporation as successor to old.

When the charter of any municipal corporation has been repealed, and the same territory has been reincorporated, the new corporation is declared to be the successor of the old corporation for the purposes of this section, §§ 6-52-106 and 6-52-107.

Acts 1903, ch. 399, § 1; Shan., § 1997a10; Code 1932, § 3514.

Cross-References. Substitution of new charter for old, § 6-1-304.

Succession on adoption of city manager charter, § 6-18-107.

Succession on surrender of city manager charter, § 6-18-112.

6-52-106. Property and debts passing to successor.

Such new corporation shall be liable for the debts of such old corporation, and shall be entitled to the property and assets of such old corporation, which shall pass to and be vested in such new corporation for the same uses and purposes for which it was held and to be used by the old corporation.

Acts 1903, ch. 399, § 2; Shan., § 1997a11; Code 1932, § 3515; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-406.

Collateral References.

Rights and remedies of director of municipal corporation that is dissolved or combined with another municipal body. 47 A.L.R. 128.

6-52-107. Collection of taxes and dues by successor.

Such new corporation is invested with the right to collect, receive, and receipt for all taxes and dues to the old corporation to which it succeeds, and shall be entitled to exercise all the remedies provided by law for the collection of such taxes and dues.

Acts 1903, ch. 399, § 3; Shan., § 1997a12; Code 1932, § 3516; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-407.